Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.270

Taxing authority, exclusive.

This chapter shall constitute the exclusive legislative authority for the taxing by any city, town, city-county or county of any gambling activity and its application shall be strictly construed to those activities herein permitted and to those persons, associations or organizations herein permitted to engage therein.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 27.]